Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-524
Enforcement; procedure.

In addition to any other remedies which may be available by law, a civil proceeding to enforce section 71-519 may be brought in the district court of the county where the infant is domiciled or found. The attending physician, the hospital or other birthing facility, the Attorney General, or the county attorney of the county where the infant is domiciled or found may institute such proceedings as are necessary to enforce such section. It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the county attorney to whom the Department of Health and Human Services reports a violation to cause appropriate proceedings to be initiated without delay. A hearing on any action brought pursuant to this section shall be held within seventy-two hours of the filing of such action, and a decision shall be rendered by the court within twenty-four hours of the close of the hearing.

Laws 1987, LB 385, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 507;

Laws 2002, LB 235, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 395.

By its terms, in addition to the specific and therefore preferred remedy in district court, this section states that the newborn screening statutes may also be enforced through "other remedies which may be available by law." Under the proper set of proven facts, enforcement through the neglect provisions of the juvenile code may be one such "other remedy." In re Interest of Anaya, 276 Neb. 825, 758 N.W.2d 10 (2008).